output/hyph-id-ml.pat.txt
tamba5k8
tami5n8a
tampik5
tamu2
tan5ism
tanak3
tanduk5
tang8e
tangka8
tanjak5
tantu5
tanya5
tapa7k
tar3ut
tara5ki
taria7
tarme8
tas4t
tas8i
tasas3
tat4r
tat8i
tata3s
tata4k3
tata5ki
tata5na
tata8ka
tau3m2
tau5l2
tawa5ka
tawa5t
tayub3
tca1
tde5n
te2ha
te2r7a
te2ru
te2uk
te3b4
te3hi
te3kis
te3ngo
te3rib
te3rip
te3rom
te3rop
te3rum
te3rus
te4li.
te4n3en
te4ni.
te4ran
te4uri
te5laj
te5lu
te5ngik5
te5r8agu
te5raya
te5reko
te5relo
te5res.
te5runy
te6rongg
te7rala
te8r5unj
te8rakuk
te8ramban
te8rambi
te8rambun
te8rampai
te8rangg
te8rangi
te8rangke
te8rasak.
te8rawai
te8rawas
te8ringat
te8ringk
te8rund
te8rungg
te8runta
te8runtuk
teban5a
tebar5
teg3r
tega8k3
tek1l
tek8i
teker3
teku8k5a
tele5k8a
tele5na
teles4
telor3
telu3k
tembu4
tembu6a
temu3k
teng8a5r6
teng8al
teng8i4
tenta5r
teok1
tep3r
tepu8k3
ter3ac
ter3ej
ter3uj
ter3ul
ter5abo
ter5aga
ter5aks
ter5alo
ter5amu
ter5anj
ter5any
ter5asp
ter5emp
ter5eva
ter5imb
ter5imp
ter5inc
ter5inj
ter5oba
ter5oks
ter5ope
ter7ent
ter7ika
ter7in
ter7isi
ter7ong
ter7un
ter8ada.
ter8ampas
ter8atap
ter8awan
tera3t
tera7ma
terap4
terap5r
terbande8
tercukup8
terdisip8
tere5kr
tere5s8a
terek4
terekon6
teri6ku
teriak5
tering8a
termin8a
ternak5
tero4i
teru3k
teto3
teu4r
tha3i
ti3gr
ti3k2l
ti3p4s
ti3pr
ti3s8ko
ti3spa
ti3ta
ti3tro
ti4k7an
ti4mi.
ti4min
ti5fi
ti5kha
ti5ni.
ti5o
ti7si
ti8kk
ti8lg
ti8ng5u
ti8rm
tia3t
tia5ni.
tian3i
tid4
tiha3t
tik3is
tik4r
tik8li
tikbe5
tiku5ti
til2i
timbu8l5
tina5k
tindak5
tip3an
tiri5k8
tis2p
tisan3
tisi3p
tisi4k3
tiso4
tisok5
tistik5
tit2
tje1
tjujut5
tka3
tkam2
tke2n
tla2k1
tmos3
tng2
tng8a
tno3
tnya2
to2ka
to3kl
to3s8ko
to4al
to4ang
to4ni.
to5ke
to5ki
to5ngo
toba5ti
toka5l
tome3r8
toni3t
tonut8rie
top5ism
top5ra
topang5
tor7an
tos5ter
tot2
tot5ron
tote8m3
toto5la
tpo3l
tr8at
tr8is
tr8un
trem5an
trembe5
trial8
triti3
tritis6
tro3b
tro3g
tro3st
tro4p3l
tro5sp
trometeo8
tsa1n
tso2
tta3k
ttimu3
tu2ma
tu2ng3
tu2pi
tu2ti
tu3k4r
tu3lis
tu4ak.
tu4at
tu4sa
tu5nab
tu8ngan
tua3r
tuju3
tula4r
tulah5
tuli5t
tungka5
tuo2r
tur8u
tusik8
tva1
u1b
u1d
u1e
u1f
u1g
u1ho
u1i
u1j
u1kha
u1l
u1ngu
u1o
u1p
u1q
u1v
u1z
u2b1o
u2d1h
u2ef
u2f1l
u2f3r
u2g4r
u2gl
u2ia
u2ie
u2kan
u2l1ov
u2laj
u2liz
u2n1ay
u2ni.
u2p1an
u2p3r
u2pi.
u2r1ul
u2ra
u2sa
u2t1em
u2ti.
u2tim
u3a
u3ed
u3el
u3gi
u3ha.
u3har
u3i3f
u3i4k
u3il.
u3k8au
u3k8is
u3ka3m
u3kac
u3kany
u3kas
u3kin
u3las
u3le4
u3lu2
u3m8i4s
u3may
u3n8is
u3ne
u3ng8a5l
u3ngab
u3ngak
u3ngas
u3ny
u3p8lin
u3pad
u3pe2
u3pi2n
u3pir
u3po
u3r8ag
u3raa
u3rab
u3rac
u3rae
u3raf
u3raj
u3rak
u3ral
u3ram
u3rin
u3rua
u3rus1
u3shal
u3sho
u3u
u3w
u4a1u
u4aa
u4asis
u4ate
u4nab
u4nub
u4num
u4r1an
u4s3int
u4sk
u4st
u4t7ah.
u4tro
u5a2p1
u5ad
u5ai
u5an
u5at.
u5ato
u5c
u5di
u5i2r1
u5id
u5ise
u5kaj
u5kak
u5kama
u5la5si
u5lar
u5las.
u5lat
u5lik
u5ngau
u5ngo
u5r8ai
u5r8ang
u5r8ap
u5r8as
u5r8at
u5r8ia
u5r8u4p1
u5ranc
u5rani
u5rant
u5re
u5rid
u5rit
u5riu
u5rung.
u5sir
u5skr
u5tana
u5ti5l2
u5tik.
u5y
u8ng.
u8ngk
u8p5lis
u8plikati
u8plikato
ua2ni
ua2r1u
ua8pa
uadu5
ual8it
uam4b
uang3
uara5k
uat5r
uatu3
ub1en
ub1l
ub3aku
ub3h
ub3li
ub3op
ub3or
ub3uni
ub5r
ub8is
uba1i
uba3u
ubal5u
ube2
ube3ri
ubek1
ubel3u
ubin3a
ubrak4
ubris5
ubu8ka
ubuk1
uburu3
uburuk6
uca2
uce8k1
ucu2
ud3r
ud8is
uda2k
udawa5
udi8olog.
udu2l
udu2r
udu5a
uduk1
udus4a
uelu3
uen1
uf8is
ufe3
ug8u2r
uga4ri
ugal1
uge8m
ugu4
uh1em
uha5mi
uhi2d
uhid3a
uhu2d
ui3ri
uita3r8
uja3k
uja4n
uju2
ujud1
uk1aw
uk3l
uk3ra
uk3re
uk3ro
uk3und
uk8aa
uk8ut
uka3ud
uke3t
uko3s8
uktiv8
uku2e
uku2l
uku2m
uku3k
uku8pi
ul2i
ul3iza
ul3umb
ul8ism
ula2n
ula4k
ula8ng3
ulah4
ulai3
ulak3u
ulak7a
ule8m3
ulek1
ulen3
uler3
uli3ni
uli4t
ulio3
ulis3a
ulu8ngu
uluh1
ulul1
ulung3
uma3n8i
uma3r
uma3t4r
uma4m
uma4ri
uma5mi
uma5ra
uman5um
uman8g
umang5u
umba7k
umbu4
umbu8k3
umene3
umi3l
umi8n5at
umpa8n
umpak3
umpu5ni
umu2d
umu2r
umu2t
un1an
un3alu
un3iah
un3ubu
un3umb
una3g
unai3
unca4
unca8n
unda4k
unda5ri
undi4k
undu4
undu5ta
undu8n
unduk3
undut4
une4k3
ung1
ung8ara
ung8i3
ung8ut
ungga8k5
unggal5
unggu5k6
ungka8s
ungkah6a
ungke5l8
ungki8l5
uno3
unos4
unta8n
unti2
untik3
untu4
untu8n
unu7h
unu8n
uo3dr
uos4
up2le
up3s
up4li
up4ran
up4ro
up5ron
up5ru
up7an.
up7l
upa3k
uper3a
upet1
upre3
upres8
upu8k3a
ur3umb
ura4pi
ura5ur
ura8nga
uraduk5
urato4
urba5k8
urbank8
ureal8
uret4
uri3b
uri3p
uri8ng
urik8a
urna5k
uro3b
uro3p
uro3r
uro3s8
uro4k
uro4p3l
uro5ps
urok5r
urolin8
uru2
uruk1
urut1
us1an
us2h
us3ko
use4l
use4r3
usi2m3
usik7an
usiona7
uso3
usok2
ustri5
ustrik8
usu2
usu5b
ut1an
ut3h
ut3ra
ut3rig
ut3ru
ut5l
ut5rad
ut5re
ut5rofo
ut7ri5
ut8rin
uta3ka
uta3ki
uta5ri
utame3
utamer8
utara5
utebu3
utebuk8
utik5an
utip1
uto3s8
utra5k
utua3
utual8
utuk7
utumba8
utus5
uu1h2
uu1n
uvi5
uw8is
uwa3n
uwi4r
uwung5
uyu2
uyub1
uyung8a
uza3
v1b
v1d
v1g
v1la
v1li
va1i
va3la
va3t
vano3
vat8i
vati5k8
ve2i3
ve2r9a
ve3h
ve3ran
ve5lo
ve5ri
ven2a
vete5
veter8
vi1h
vi3f
vi4an
vi5o
vi5ru
vin8i
vio3s8
visin3
vo3p
vo5l2a
vo8uc
vokal5a
vu3k
wa1u
wa2bi
wa2e
wa2i
wa2ma
wa2n
wa3dy
wa3gr
wa3idu
wa3kr
wa3li5
wa3ngi
wa3ngu
wa3p
wa3s2r
wa3ti
wa4l3af
wa4taw
wa8hl
wa8kl
wab3an
wada3s
wag4
wahi5
wai3t
waki2
wale3n
walot3
wangki5
wangkis6
wantek5
wantil5
wapa1
wara5k
wara7n
warang8a
wari4s
warna5
was3aw
was3w
was5t
wasi4t
wata4k
we2t
weduk3
wes1a
wet1a
wi1h
wi3k4
wi3ra
wi5ru
wila3h4
wimat5
win1i
wipe5
wiper4
wiri2
wit2
witi8
witis3
wo2i
wo3ni
wo5la
wo5n2a
wok2
wori4
wu2ka
wu2ri
wu3d
wu3h2
wu3na
wu3s
wu4ta
wu5l2
wujud3
wulu3s4
wung4a
wunggu5
wur1a
wuyu3
x1p
xi5l2
y1b
y1d
y1f
y1h
y1k
y1r
y1t
y2o
ya1uh
ya1ul
ya1up
ya2pa
ya2pi
ya3g4
ya3hub
ya3i3t2
ya3ira
ya3li
ya3pad
ya3sa
ya3u4k1
ya4ko
ya8k3ay
yada2
yadur5
yah3an
yahut3
yai5ri
yaki2
yalib3
yalin4
yam2a
yama3h4
yama4k7
yambu7
yami8
yamik3
yampe4
yangkak8
yapa3t
yapu3k
yari5k8
yas2
yas4t
yata3
yatro4
yatu3k
yau2r
yawer3
ye2u4
ye3ka
ye3ngi
ye3ngu
ye3r2e4
ye3ra
ye3t4a
ye7t4ru
yeba4
yebab3
yebar5
yeber8
yebera8
yega2
yektiv8
yela8n
yembu8l5
yempa8t
yemu3k
yenda4
yendat5
yente4
yepa8kan
yer8i
yerantak8
yerbe8
yerik8
yerta3
yeru3k
yesa2
yetop3
yeur1
yi3f
yi3l
yika2
yiku3
yilet5
yilu3
yimpa8
yina2
yipa8
yira2
yiri8
yirik3
yisi2
yisi7k7
yisip3
yo2ka
yo2m
yo2t1
yo3ha
yo4sp
yong1
yongko5
yongkol6
yopa8
yopi2
yta5
yu2m4a
yu2mi
yu2ti
yu3hu
yu3ka
yu3l
yu5tra.
yua3s
yuku2
yula5k8
yun4k
yung4a
yusu3k4
yut1
yut4r
z1l
za1h
za2i
za3im
za3ti
za4a
zali2
zalim3
zam2a
ze3i
ze3k
zi3b
zi3p
zim3an
zio4
zlo3
zo3ha
zo3i
zo3o
zo5sp
zoe3
zono3
zos3f
zu1h
zu3k
zu3n
zu3r
ê1d
ê1n
ê3r
êng8a
êra1
